Maryland, session 2025, HB0380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
14 That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
15 Article – Criminal Law
16 [10–105.
17 (a) A person may not sell or offer for sale a contraceptive or a contraceptive device,
18 whether or not advertised as a prophylactic, by means of a vending machine or other
19 automatic device at a kindergarten, nursery school, or elementary or secondary school.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0380*

2 HOUSE BILL 380
1 (b) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
2 conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 for each violation.
3 (2) Each vending machine or other automatic device in a school is a
4 separate violation.]
5 SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
6 October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.